Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0465.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1i. (1) A person is exempt from the licensure provisions of this act as provided for in subsection (2) if the person files an affidavit with the department that affirms all of the following: (a) Before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the person lawfully sold a nicotine or tobacco product at retail. (b) An application under section 1c has been submitted for the person and the application is pending department approval. (c) The person has not been granted a license. (2) A person's exemption under subsection (1) expires when the person's application under section 1c is no longer pending department approval. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 462 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.